Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1404
Municipality; state; agreement; Governor; approval.

The State of Nebraska is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with a municipality providing for the supplying by such municipality to the state of buildings or other facilities or portions thereof in such municipality or the zoning area authorized by law for the municipality. No such agreement shall be entered into unless (1) the Legislature shall theretofore specify the municipality and in general terms the type of building or facility or portion thereof to which such agreement shall pertain, and (2) in the event that any such agreement shall deal in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall, as a condition precedent to the entry into force, be submitted to the state officer or agency for such power or control and shall be approved or disapproved by him or it within all matters of his or its jurisdiction. Each such agreement shall be approved by the Governor, shall be executed in the name and on behalf of the state and shall be signed by the Governor.

Laws 1967, c. 464, § 4, p. 1437.